Hawaii, session 2025, SB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 266-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§266-52  Powers. In addition and supplemental to the powers granted to the department by law, the department may: (1)  With the approval of the governor, enter into a special facility lease or an amendment or supplement thereto whereby the department agrees with another person engaged in maritime and maritime-related operations to construct, acquire, remodel, furnish, or equip a special facility solely for the use by [such] that other person to a special facility lease; provided that [such] the special facility lease may be amendatory and supplemental to an existing lease between the department and [such] the other person for the land upon which the special facility which is the subject of [such] the special facility lease is to be situated; (2)  With the approval of the governor: (A)  Issue special facility revenue bonds in [such] principal amounts as may be necessary to yield the amount of the cost of any construction, acquisition, remodeling, furnishing, and equipping of any special facility; provided that the total principal amount of the special facility revenue bonds which may be issued pursuant to the authorization of this subparagraph shall not exceed [$100,000,000;] $600,000,000; and (B)  Issue special facility revenue refunding bonds, without further authorization by the legislature, to refund outstanding special facility revenue bonds, including special facility revenue refunding bonds, or any part thereof, at or before the maturity or redemption date, issued pursuant to this part; provided that any issuance of the refunding bonds shall not reduce the amount authorized by the legislature as provided in paragraph (2)(A); (3)  Perform and carry out the terms and provisions of any special facility lease; (4)  Notwithstanding section 103-7 or any other law to the contrary, acquire, construct, remodel, furnish, or equip any special facility, or accept the assignment of any contract therefor entered into by the other person to the special facility lease; (5)  Construct any special facility on land owned by the State; and (6)  Agree with the other person to the special facility lease whereby any acquisition, construction, remodeling, furnishing, or equipping of the special facility and the expenditure of moneys therefor shall be undertaken or supervised by [such] the other person." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST